Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1519.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 43-117 of Title 11, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. “Business” has the same meaning as that provided in Section
2001 of Title 18 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. “Home-based business” means a business that is operated:
a. on a residential property,
b. by the owner or tenant of such property, and
c. for the purpose of:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1519 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(1) manufacturing, providing, or selling a lawful
good, or
(2) providing a lawful service;
3. “No-impact home-based business” means a home-based business
that:
a. has, at any time on the residential property where
such business is operated, a total number of
employees, clients, or patrons of such business that
does not exceed the occupancy limit for such property
established by municipal ordinance,
b. does not generate on-street parking or a substantial
increase in vehicular traffic in the surrounding area,
c. conducts business activities in a manner which
prevents the viewing of such activities from any
street or highway, and
d. does not substantially increase noise of the
surrounding area or otherwise violate any regulation
of noise established by municipal ordinance; and
4. “Short-term rental unit” means any residential dwelling, or
a portion of such dwelling, that is rented for a period of less than
thirty (30) consecutive days.
B. No municipal governing body may adopt or enforce any
ordinance, regulation, or measure that:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1519 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. Prohibits the operation of a no-impact home-based business
within the limits of the municipality;
2. Requires a person operating a no-impact home-based business,
or owning the property where such business operates, to obtain a
license, permit, or any other form of approval to operate such
business; or
3. Requires a person operating a no-impact home-based business,
or owning the property where such business operates, to:
a. file for a zoning change allowing for a non-
residential use of such property, or
b. install a fire suppression system if the property
where such business operates exclusively consists of:
(1) a single-family detached residential structure,
or
(2) a multi-family residential structure with not
more than two residential units.
C. Except as provided for in subsection B of this section, a
municipal governing body may adopt or enforce an ordinance,
regulation, or measure that requires a no-impact home-based business
to:
1. Be in compliance with federal, state, and local law,
including:
a. municipal fire and building code, and
b. municipal regulations related to:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1519 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(1) health and sanitation,
(2) transportation or traffic control,
(3) solid or hazardous waste,
(4) pollution and noise control, or
(5) nuisance, as provided by Section 22-121 of Title
11 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. Be compatible with the residential use of the property where
such business is located;
3. Ensure that any business activities are secondary to the use
of such property as a dwelling; and
4. Not engage in:
a. the sale of alcohol or trafficking of illegal drugs,
b. the operation of a transitional living facility or
halfway house, as defined in Section 3-403 of Title
43A of the Oklahoma Statutes, or
c. the operation of a sexually oriented business, as
defined in Section 1040.55 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
D. The provisions of this section shall not be construed as
prohibiting:
1. Any person from enforcing a rule or deed restriction imposed
by a homeowners’ association or by other private agreement;
2. A municipal governing body from adopting or enforcing an
ordinance regulating the operation of a short-term rental unit; or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1519 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. A municipal governing body from carrying out its obligation
to ensure the public safety of the municipality.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON LOCAL AND COUNTY GOVERNMENT
February 3, 2026 - DO PASS




















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1519 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)